Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-681
Districts existing on August 30, 2009; director holding office when charter amended; how treated.

In order to provide for orderly compliance with Chapter 70, article 6, districts existing on August 30, 2009, are hereby deemed to be properly constituted and incorporated and their directors duly elected and, notwithstanding any other provision of law, a district shall not be required to amend its charter in order to be in such compliance until six months after the publication of the first federal decennial census published after August 30, 2009. A director holding office at the time of any such amendment to a charter may continue to serve until the expiration of his or her term of office if such director meets the qualifications of section 70-619 for holding office under the charter as so amended.

Laws 1986, LB 949, § 15;

Laws 2009, LB53, § 5.
August 30, 2009